District of Columbia statutes.
9-1174

Comprehensive assessment.

(a)

By January 1, 2014, and by that date every 3 years thereafter, the Mayor shall submit to the Council an assessment on the:

(1)

Advances in propulsion technology;

(2)

Feasibility, including cost, of converting to non-aerial motive power where aerial wiring has been installed;

(3)

Feasibility, including cost, of using non-aerial motive power on such segments of the streetcar system where construction has yet to be initiated; and

(4)

Any recommended amendments to this chapter, including a potential sunset date.

(b)

The Council shall hold a public hearing on this report.

Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-339, § 5, 58 DCR 618
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5 of Transportation Infrastructure Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-583, October 19, 2010, 57 DCR 10129).